Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.040

Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor.

[ 1991 c 3 s 260; 1987 c 150 s 64.]